West Virginia, session 2026, HB4146.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. PREVENTION AND CONTROL OF COMMUNICABLE AND OTHER INFECTIOUS DISEASES. §16-3-4d. Compulsory vaccination schedule for all school employees; quarantine schedule; proof of vaccination of visitors required. (a) Every teacher, administrator, nurse, board member, county office employee, bus driver, custodian, or anyone otherwise employed by a public school system in this state shall be fully vaccinated according to the pediatric schedule. (1) Mandatory vaccinations include, but are not limited to, the following: five doses of DTaP/Tdap, three doses of Hepatitis B, four doses of HiB, three doses of Polio, two doses of MMR, one dose of Varicella, four doses of Prevnar (Pneumococcal), two doses of Hepatitis A, two doses of MCV4 (Meningococcal), the full HPV series, annual flu shots, and COVID-19 vaccines. (2) No religious or philosophical exemptions are permitted unless such exemptions are honored for students.(b) Any student, teacher, administrator or staff member who travels to a state that currently allows vaccine exemptions for students shall be prohibited from returning to school for at least 21 days upon his or her return.(1) This includes conferences, vacations and athletic tournaments that a student, teacher, administrator or staff member attends.(2) Students may complete coursework remotely during the 21-day period. (3) Employees shall use personal or vacation leave to satisfy the 21-day period. (c) Parents, guest speakers, maintenance contractors, or anyone who enters a public-school building in this state shall be fully vaccinated according to the pediatric schedule. (1) No exemptions are permitted, unless such an exemption matches the student exemption process. (2) Proof of vaccination shall be required at the door before an individual may enter a public-school building in this state.